Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of St. Paul for the West Side Community Organization to address economic development and job retention efforts for businesses employing the equivalent of ten or less full-time employees. Grant money may be used for: technical assistance; establishing revolving loan funds; issuing loans, including no interest and forgivable loans; and grants to small businesses for operating expenses. This appropriation is onetime and available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of West St. Paul to work in consultation with the Residents of Color Collective on economic development and job retention efforts for businesses employing the equivalent of ten or less full-time employees. Grant money may be used for: technical assistance; establishing revolving loan funds; issuing loans, including no interest and forgivable loans; and grants to small businesses for operating expenses. This appropriation is onetime and available until June 30, 2028. new text end